Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-4,120
Methods authorized.

Reorganization of school districts pursuant to the Learning Community Reorganization Act may be accomplished through or by means of any one or more of the following methods: (1) The creation of new districts; (2) the uniting of one or more established districts; (3) the subdivision of one or more established districts; (4) the transfer and attachment to an established district of a part of the territory of one or more districts; and (5) the dissolution or disorganization of an established district for any of the reasons specified by law.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 31.